District of Columbia statutes.
44-1002.08

Final accounting.

Within 30 calendar days after termination of a receivership, the receiver shall give the court a complete accounting of all property with which he or she has been entrusted, all funds collected, and all expenses incurred.

History

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 208, 33 DCR 1510

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 32-1418.